Maryland, session 2026, SB0660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0660*

SENATE BILL 660
(e) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of this title.
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Law enforcement agency” means a governmental police force, sheriff’s
office, or security force or law enforcement organization of the State, a county, or a
municipal corporation that by statute, ordinance, or common law is authorized to enforce
the general criminal laws of the State.
(2) “Law enforcement agency” does not include members of the Maryland
National Guard who:
(i) are under the control and jurisdiction of the Military
Department;
(ii) are assigned to the military property designated as the Martin
State Airport; and
(iii) are charged with exercising police powers in and for the Martin
State Airport.
3–535.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 6–111 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO § 5–104 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE, ON
RECEIVING NOTICE OF AN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION HAPPENING IN A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S JURISDICTION, A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
SHALL DISPATCH AT LEAST ONE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER TO:
(I) OBSERVE THE IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
(II) ENSURE THE SAFE TRANSFER OF AN INDIVIDUAL IN
CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
(III) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY POLICY ADOPTED UNDER § 3–511
OF THIS SUBTITLE, AND TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, RECORD THE IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT ACTION WITH THE OFFICER’S BODY–WORN CAMERA;
(IV) FILE A REPORT DOCUMENTING THE ACTIVITY OF
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS, INCLUDING:

SENATE BILL 660 3
1. THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION OF THE ACTION;
2. IF APPLICABLE, THE TYPE OF WARRANT USED FOR
THE IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
3. WHAT FEDERAL AGENCIES WERE INVOLVED WITH THE
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
4. A DESCRIPTION OF ANY FORCE USED DURING THE
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
5. WHETHER ANY MEDICAL ATTENTION WAS REQUIRED
AS A RESULT OF THE IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
6. WHETHER THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS WERE
RESTRICTED FROM OBSERVING OR RECORDING THE IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
ACTION; AND
7. ANY VIOLATIONS OF LAW THE OFFICER OBSERVED
DURING THE IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION; AND
(V) PRESERVE ANY EVIDENCE RELATED TO THE IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT ACTION.
(2) WHILE RESPONDING TO AN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
ACTION, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL CONTINUE TO PERFORM THE
CONSTITUTIONAL OBLIGATIONS OF THE OFFICER’S POSITION.
(3) THE DOCUMENTATION AND FOOTAGE RECORDED CONSISTENT
WITH PARAGRAPH (1)(III) AND (IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE
PROVISIONS OF TITLE 4 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(4) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY POLICY ADOPTED UNDER § 3–511
OF THIS SUBTITLE, FOOTAGE RECORDED CONSISTENT WITH PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE STORED FOR AT LEAST 4 MONTHS.
(II) THE REPORT FILED CONSISTENT WITH PARAGRAPH (1)(IV)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE STORED FOR AT LEAST 4 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.